Illinois, session 104th, SB3102.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The State Finance Act is amended by adding 5Section 5.1038 as follows: 6    (30 ILCS 105/5.1038 new)7    Sec. 5.1038. The Indigent Intelligent Speed Assistance 8Device Fund. 9    Section 10. The Illinois Vehicle Code is amended by adding 10Sections 1-131.7 and 11-613 as follows: 11    (625 ILCS 5/1-131.7 new)12    Sec. 1-131.7. Intelligent speed assistance device. A 13device that is installed in a motor vehicle and uses 14technology to limit the speed of a motor vehicle at 5 miles per 15hour more than the speed limit in a specific zone, allowing for 16the slight acceleration past the speed limit, if necessary, 17based on traffic conditions. 18    (625 ILCS 5/11-613 new)19    Sec. 11-613. Use of intelligent speed assistance devices. 20    (a) If a person who is convicted of violating a speed   SB3102- 2 -LRB104 16716 LNS 30122 b1restriction of this Code is found to have driven a vehicle upon 2a highway at a speed greater than 100 miles per hour, the court 3shall, in addition to any other penalty, order that the person 4have installed an intelligent speed assistance device in any 5motor vehicle owned or operated by the person for at least 12 6months or for the duration of the license suspension or 7revocation, whichever is longer. The clerk of the court shall 8forward the court's order to the Secretary.9    (b) The person shall provide proof of the installation as 10set forth in subsection (h). If the person fails to provide 11proof of installation, the Secretary may suspend the person's 12license, modify an existing order of suspension, or order the 13revocation of the person's license or driving privileges.14    (c) The person shall request permission to remove the 15intelligent speed assistance device from the Secretary at the 16end of the person's mandated period of use of the intelligent 17speed assistance device. Upon receiving this request, the 18Secretary may require the person to complete a written driving 19test and a road test prior to having the intelligent speed 20assistance device removed. The Secretary may deny the request 21to remove the intelligent speed assistance device based upon 22the person's performance on the written driving test, the road 23test, or the person's driving record during the period the 24intelligent speed assistance device was used.25    (d) The cost of installing and maintaining an intelligent 26speed assistance device shall be incurred by the person   SB3102- 3 -LRB104 16716 LNS 30122 b1subject to the requirement unless the court or the Secretary 2determines that the person is financially unable to afford the 3cost, in which case the cost may be waived as set forth in 4subsection (h). At the end of the required installation 5period, an intelligent speed assistance device shall be 6returned to a qualified service provider under subsection (e). 7If deemed to be in working order after being returned to a 8qualified service provider, the intelligent speed assistance 9device may be installed in any other motor vehicle required to 10have an intelligent speed assistance device installed.11    (f) The Secretary shall create a list of approved 12intelligent speed assistance devices. An approved intelligent 13speed assistance device must be capable of accurately 14detecting speed limits across road and weather conditions, and 15the Secretary may adopt any rules necessary to further ensure 16that an intelligent speed assistance device operates reliably.17    (g) The Secretary shall create a list of service providers 18that are qualified to install, service, inspect, and remove an 19approved intelligent speed assistance device. This list may 20include any installation or service provider that is approved 21for the installation, servicing, and removal of an approved 22intelligent speed assistance device.23    (h) Proof of the installation of an intelligent speed 24assistance device under subsection (a) shall occur within 10 25days of the court order. If a person ordered to install an 26intelligent speed assistance device is unable to financially   SB3102- 4 -LRB104 16716 LNS 30122 b1afford the cost of the intelligent speed assistance device, 2the person may request in writing, within 10 days of receiving 3the notification from the Secretary, a payment plan or to have 4payment for the intelligent speed assistance device waived. 5Within 30 days after the initial installation of the 6intelligent speed assistance device, the intelligent speed 7assistance device shall be inspected by a qualified service 8provider to ensure the intelligent speed assistance device is 9properly calibrated and installed.10    (i) No person shall tamper with or circumvent an otherwise 11operable intelligent speed assistance device. No person 12subject to a court ordered intelligent speed assistance device 13shall operate a motor vehicle without an intelligent speed 14assistance device.15    (j) A violation of this Section, or assisting another 16person to violate this Section, shall be Class A misdemeanor.17    (k) The Secretary shall submit a report every 24 months to 18the Governor and the General Assembly with the following 19information about intelligent speed assistance device mandates 20under this Section:21        (1) The number of individuals required to have an 22    intelligent speed assistance device in a motor vehicle the 23    individual owns or operates.24        (2) The number of motor vehicles required to have an 25    intelligent speed assistance device installed.26        (3) The number of fee waivers approved to waive the   SB3102- 5 -LRB104 16716 LNS 30122 b1    entire fee for installing an intelligent speed assistance 2    device.3        (4) The number of individuals on a payment plan for an 4    intelligent speed assistance device.5        (5) The number of speeding violations issued to 6    individuals who have an intelligent speed assistance 7    device installed.8        (6) The number of other traffic law infractions 9    committed by individuals with an intelligent speed 10    assistance device installed, organized by category or type 11    of traffic violation.12        (7) The number of reported crashes involving 13    individuals who have an intelligent speed assistance 14    device installed.15        (8) The number of known individuals who have not 16    complied with this Section, separated into the following 17    categories:18            (A) Individuals who did not initially install an 19        intelligent speed assistance device as required.20            (B) Individuals who removed an intelligent speed 21        assistance device before a follow-up inspection.22            (C) Individuals who were cited for not having an 23        intelligent speed assistance device properly installed 24        during a traffic stop.25    This report shall be made publicly available on the 26Secretary of State's website.   SB3102- 6 -LRB104 16716 LNS 30122 b1    (l) The Indigent Intelligent Speed Assistance Device Fund 2is created as a special fund in the State treasury. The 3Secretary shall, subject to appropriation, use all money in 4the Fund to reimburse service providers who have installed 5intelligent speed assistance devices in the vehicles of 6indigent persons. The Secretary shall make payments to such 7providers every 3 months. If the amount of money in the Fund at 8the time payments are made is not sufficient to pay all 9requests for reimbursement submitted during that 3-month 10period, the Secretary shall make payments on a pro rata basis, 11and those payments shall be considered payment in full for the 12requests submitted. If the amount of money in the Fund exceeds 13the amount necessary to pay all requests for reimbursement 14during that 3-month period, the Secretary shall disburse the 15excess to the service providers on a pro rata basis. 16    A service provider that supplies an approved intelligent 17speed assistance device under this Section shall, for each 18intelligent speed assistance device installed, pay 5% of the 19total gross revenue received for the intelligent speed 20assistance device into the Indigent Intelligent Speed 21Assistance Device Fund. This 5% shall be clearly indicated as 22a separate surcharge on each invoice that is issued. The 23Secretary shall conduct an annual review of the Fund to 24determine whether the surcharge is sufficient to provide for 25indigent users. The Secretary may increase or decrease this 26surcharge requirement as needed.   SB3102- 7 -LRB104 16716 LNS 30122 b1    (m) A person who is required to use an intelligent speed 2assistance device and must drive an employer-owned vehicle in 3the course of employment duties may seek permission to drive 4an employer-owned vehicle that does not have an intelligent 5speed assistance device. The employer shall provide to the 6Secretary a form, as prescribed by the Secretary, completed by 7the employer verifying that the employee must drive an 8employer-owned vehicle in the course of employment. If 9approved by the Secretary, the form must be in the driver's 10possession while operating an employer-owned vehicle not 11equipped with an intelligent speed assistance device. No 12person may use this exemption to drive a school bus, school 13vehicle, or a vehicle designed to transport more than 15 14passengers. No person may use this exemption to drive an 15employer-owned motor vehicle that is owned by an entity that 16is wholly or partially owned by the person who is required to 17use an intelligent speed assistance device, or by a family 18member of the person. No person may use this exemption to drive 19an employer-owned vehicle that is made available to the 20employee for personal use. No person may drive the exempted 21vehicle more than 12 hours per day, 6 days per week. 22    (n) The Secretary may adopt any rules necessary to 23implement this Section.